Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 48
EASEMENTS

Section

34-48-101. Right-of-way for water.

Whenever any persons are engaged in bringing water into any portion of a mine, they have the right-of-way secured to them, and may pass over any claim, road ditch, or other structure, if the water is guarded so as not to interfere with prior rights.

Source:

R.S.

p. 465, § 2.

G.L.

§ 1798.

G.S.

§ 2387.

R.S. 08:

§ 4212.

C.L.

§ 3294.

CSA:

C. 110, § 184.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-1.

34-48-102. Mine under buildings.

No person has the right to mine under any building or other improvement unless he shall first secure the parties owning the same against all damages, except by priority of right.

Source:

R.S.

p. 465, § 3.

G.L.

§ 1799.

G.S.

§ 2388.

R.S. 08:

§ 4213.

C.L.

§ 3295.

CSA:

C. 110, § 185.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-2.

34-48-103. Flooding - tailings - liability.

In no case shall any person be allowed to flood the property of another person with water, or wash down the tailings of his sluice upon the claim or property of other persons, but it is the duty of every miner to take care of his own tailings, upon his own property, or become responsible for all damages that may arise therefrom.

Source:

R.S.

p. 466, § 8.

G.L.

§ 1804.

G.S.

§ 2393.

R.S. 08:

§ 4214.

C.L.

§ 3296.

CSA:

C. 110, § 186.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-3.

34-48-104. Right-of-way for hauling quartz.

Every miner has the right-of-way across any and all claims for the purpose of hauling quartz from his claim.

Source:

R.S.

p. 466, § 9.

G.L.

§ 1805.

G.S.

§ 2394.

R.S. 08:

§ 4215.

C.L.

§ 3297.

CSA:

C. 110, § 187.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-4.

34-48-105. Rights-of-way - condemnation.

All mining claims, including patented and unpatented claims, shall be subject to the right-of-way of any ditch, flume, pipeline for transporting water or air for mining purposes, or of any tram, tramway, or pack trail, across any such locations or claims. Any person or corporation desiring to construct, maintain, and operate any such flume, ditch, pipeline, tram, tramway, or pack trail shall pay due and just compensation for such right-of-way to the owner of the claim through which it is proposed to construct, operate, and maintain such flume, ditch, pipeline, tram, tramway, or pack trail. When the parties cannot agree upon such right-of-way and the amount of compensation to be paid the owner of such claim, the same shall be determined in the manner provided by law for the exercise of right of eminent domain. Such ditch, flume, or pipeline shall be so constructed that the water from such ditch, flume, or pipeline shall not injure vested rights by flooding.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 188, § 11.

G.L.

§ 1821.

G.S.

§ 2407.

R.S. 08:

§ 4216.

L. 17:

p. 378, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3298.

CSA:

C. 110, § 188.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-5.

34-48-106. Security for mining under surface.

When the right to mine is in any case separate from the ownership or right of occupancy to the surface, the owner or rightful occupant of the surface may demand satisfactory security from the miner, and if it is refused, he may enjoin such miner from working until such security is given. The order for injunction shall fix the amount of bond.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 188, § 12.

G.L.

§ 1822.

G.S.

§ 2408.

R.S. 08:

§ 4217.

C.L.

§ 3299.

CSA:

C. 110, § 189.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-6.

34-48-107. Tunnels - drifts - right-of-way - condemnation.

The owner of any mining claim or property who, by reason of established rights, shall be entitled to follow any mineral-bearing vein or lode into the property of another, and the owner of any mining claim or property lying on two or more sides of the property of another has the right to enter and cross such adjoining or intermediate claims or property, with such drifts, tunnels, and crosscuts as may be necessary for the practical or economical mining and development of his own property and for the purpose of extracting and removing ore therefrom. When any such owner and the owners of such adjoining or intermediate claims or property through which such owner desires to pass under the terms of this section and sections 34-48-108 and 34-48-109 shall be unable to agree upon the terms, conditions, and purchase price of rights-of-way for such necessary drifts, tunnels, and crosscuts, then the owner seeking to exercise the rights granted in this section may exercise the right of eminent domain and condemn the rights-of-way into, across, and through such intermediate or adjacent lands such as may be necessary for the practical and economical working of his own property, and such rights-of-way are declared to be private ways of necessity.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 483, § 1.

CSA:

C. 110, § 190.

L. 43:

p. 432, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-7.

34-48-108. Accounting.

Any owner exercising the rights and privileges granted in this article shall do so in such manner as not to interfere with the mining operations of the owner into or through whose property he seeks to go, and shall extract only such ore as is necessary in the reasonable exercise of the rights granted in this article, and all ore extracted shall be accounted for by the person exercising such rights to the owner of the property from which such ore is taken, at its gross value on the surface.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 484, § 2.

CSA:

C. 110, § 191.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-8.

34-48-109. Surveys.

The owners of land through which it is proposed to construct such tunnel shall have the right at any reasonable time, upon application to the superintendent or other managing officer of such condemning owner, to enter his works with their surveyors and inspectors for the purpose of inspection and making a survey of any such works and shall have the right of ingress and egress through said works at all reasonable times.

Source:

L. 27:

p. 484, § 3.

CSA:

C. 110, § 192.

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-9.

34-48-110. Rights-of-way for conveyance and storage of water.

All persons and corporations engaged in mining or milling of ores have the right-of-way over, upon, under, and across all mining claims, including patented and unpatented claims, or other lands, for the construction, maintenance, and operation of flumes, ditches, pipelines, and conduits to convey water for use in said mines and mills, and to convey tailings and waste from said mines, mills, and reduction plants, and may also take and condemn any such claims or other lands for the construction, maintenance, and operation of reservoirs to be used for the settling or storing of tailings or waste from any such mines, mills, and reduction plants, without the consent of the owners of such property affected.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 850, § 1.

CSA:

C. 110, § 192(1).

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-10.

34-48-111. Right of eminent domain.

All persons or corporations shall pay due and just compensation for rights-of-way to the owners of the property through which it is proposed to construct any flume, ditch, pipeline, or conduit or upon which any reservoirs shall be located. When the parties cannot agree upon such right-of-way or reservoir site or the amount of compensation to be paid therefor, all such persons or corporations are vested with the power of eminent domain and are authorized to proceed to acquire such rights-of-way for flumes, ditches, pipelines, conduits, and reservoir sites, in the manner provided by law for the exercise of the right of eminent domain.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 851, § 2.

CSA:

C. 110, § 192(2).

CRS 53:

§ 92-24-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-24-11.

Cross references:

For right of eminent domain, see articles 1 to 7 of title 38.